Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
481H]

WATER
TREATMENT UNITS

Section

481H-1 Short title

481H-2 Definitions

481H-3 Requirement for sale, lease or
distribution

481H-4 Disclosure

481H-5 Prohibited practices

481H-6 Door-to-door sales

481H-7 Exchanges

481H-8 Remedies

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next